New Jersey, session 222, A1027.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: "Primarily consists of contact with children" means 80 percent or more of the actual or official duties or responsibilities include contact with a child. "Sex offender" means a person who has been convicted, adjudicated delinquent or found not guilty by reason of insanity for commission of a sex offense as defined in subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-2). 2.    a.  It shall be a crime of the third degree for a sex offender to hold a job which primarily consists of contact with children. b.    It shall be a crime of the third degree to knowingly hire a sex offender for a job which primarily consists of contact with children. c.    The provisions of this act shall not apply to participation by a sex offender under 18 years of age in a job which provides rehabilitative or other services to juvenile sex offenders. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.